Massachusetts, session 194th, H1204.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, in addition to
any qualifying event under federal law, rule, or regulation that makes one eligible for a special
enrollment period for enrollment in a qualified health plan in the state health insurance exchange
established pursuant to the federal patient protection and affordable care act, the state health
insurance exchange shall allow for the enrollment of a pregnant individual within 30 days
following the commencement of the pregnancy; provided however, that the pregnancy is
certified by a licensed health care provider, as defined in chapter 112 of the General Laws. Upon
such enrollment, any qualified health plan in the state health insurance exchange shall ensure that
coverage is effective on the first day of the month in which said certification is received.
of 2

SECTION 2. This act shall take effect on January 1, 2026.
of 2